Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Juvenile Health Recovery Study

§§ 43-27-301 through 43-27-307.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1999, ch. 587, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

43-27-301. [Laws, 1999, ch. 587, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.]

43-27-303. [Laws, 1999, ch. 587, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.]

43-27-305. [Laws, 1999, ch. 587, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1999.]

43-27-307. [Laws, 1999, ch. 587, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 547, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2000.]

§ 43-27-309.
Repeal of Sections 43-27-301 through 43-27-309.

This chapter which establishes a Juvenile Health Recovery Review and a Juvenile Health Recovery Advisory Board are repealed from and after July 1, 2001.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 587, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1999.